Hawaii statutes.
§122A-13 Civil groups. No civil
organization, society, club, post, order, fraternity, association, brotherhood,
body, union, league, or other combination of persons or civil group shall be
enlisted in the Hawaii state defense force as an organization or unit. [L 1987,
c 35, pt of §1; am L 1988, c 135, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next